Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 9 On-premises Consumption
3-9-240. Hotel or large-event facility private club permit.

(a)(1)

An application for a hotel or large-event facility private club permit shall be in writing and shall provide information concerning the applicant for the hotel or large-event facility private club permit and the premises to be used by the applicant as the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division requires.

(2)

A hotel or large-event facility private club permit may be issued only in a county or a territory of a county that does not allow the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors as provided under §3-8-201.

(b)

The application for a hotel or large-event facility private club permit shall be accompanied by a check or money order for the amount required by this section for the hotel or large-event facility private club permit.

(c)

A hotel or large-event facility private club permit application shall contain a description of the premises permitted and provide proof that the space leased has at least:

(1)

Eighty (80) lodging rooms and five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.) of public meeting, banquet, or restaurant space from a hotel; or

(2)

Ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.) of interior or exterior public meeting, banquet, exhibit hall, or restaurant space from a large-event facility.

(d)

If the director grants an application for a hotel or large-event facility private club permit, he or she shall issue a hotel or large-event facility private club permit in a form as determined by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(e)(1)

A hotel or large-event facility private club permit authorizes the dispensing, service, and consumption of alcoholic beverages by and to members and their guests on the premises of a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee for on-premises consumption at a hotel or large-event facility leased to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.

(2)

The areas of a hotel or large-event facility that may be leased to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee for purposes of a hotel or large-event facility private club permit include without limitation:

(A)

Sleeping rooms;

(B)

Pool-side bars;

(C)

Banquet facilities;

(D)

Restaurants;

(E)

Lobbies;

(F)

Exhibit halls;

(G)

Patios; and

(H)

Outdoor gardens.

(3)

Members of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee that holds a hotel or large-event facility private club permit may move from one area to another area designated under subdivision (e)(2) of this section while consuming alcoholic beverages.

(f)(1)

A hotel or large-event facility that leases all or a portion of its premises to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee shall clearly identify the areas of the hotel or large-event facility that are leased to the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.

(2)(A)

Areas leased by a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee that contain articles of historic interest or art or dramatic or musical presentations shall be open to members of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee and to nonmembers of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.

(B)

However, a person must be a member or the guest of a member of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee to consume or possess alcoholic beverages dispensed by the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.

(3)

Persons under twenty-one (21) years of age may be allowed on the premises of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.

(4)(A)

A hotel holding a hotel or large-event facility private club permit under this section may lease a sleeping room to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee for the service of alcoholic beverages.

(B)

The hotel holding a hotel or large-event facility private club permit may use room service to serve the alcoholic beverage.

(C)

The hotel holding a hotel or large-event facility private club permit may stock the leased sleeping room with alcoholic beverages, and the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee through the hotel's employees shall inventory the alcoholic beverages in the leased sleeping room.

(D)

Sleeping rooms that are solely occupied by persons twenty (20) years of age and under shall not receive alcoholic beverages through room service or be stocked with alcoholic beverages.

(5)

A hotel or large-event facility that leases space to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee shall provide a means of entering the hotel or large-event facility to allow a person to knowingly decide if he or she would like to become a member of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee.

(g)(1)

A hotel leasing its premises to a hotel or large-event facility private club permittee may include a membership application to the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee as part of its registration materials.

(2)

A guest of a hotel becoming a member of the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee shall receive a membership card.

(3)

A hotel that includes a membership application to the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee as part of its registration materials shall retain the registration materials as required by the division.

(4)

A hotel or large-event facility private club permittee may refuse a membership or revoke a membership of a person that does not abide by the hotel or large-event facility private club permittee rules.

(h)(1)(A)

For a hotel, the application and renewal fee for a hotel or large-event facility private club permit is one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per year payable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

(B)

In an area in which the sale of intoxicating liquor has not been authorized by local option as provided under §3-8-201 et seq., the application for a hotel or large-event facility private club permit shall be accompanied by an additional application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2)

The application and renewal fee for a large-event facility for a hotel or large-event facility private club permit is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per year payable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

(i)

The director shall promulgate rules to enforce this section.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1194, § 3; 2013, No. 1123, §§ 2, 3.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “holding a hotel or large-event facility private club permit” in (f)(4)(B) and (f)(4)(C); in (h)(1)(A), substituted “the renewal fee for” for “by” and “is” for “shall be accompanied by an annual permit fee of” and inserted “per year payable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1”; and deleted (h)(1)(C) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

3-9-241. Posting information about the National Human Trafficking Resource Center hotline.

An entity governed by this subchapter shall post information about the National Human Trafficking Resource Center hotline as required under §12-19-102.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1157, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Wine

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 585, § 34: approved Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to establish an orderly procedure which will insure the monthly and quarterly distribution of funds for the necessary services and operations of the state government, as provided for in this act, it is necessary that the provisions of this act become effective immediately; that under the provisions of this act seriously needed improvements for many of our public institutions are contemplated, and only the provisions of this act will provide such funds which will be adequate to alleviate this situation; and that only the provisions of this act will correct many of our financial difficulties, and which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1979, No. 141, § 3: Mar. 23, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relating to selling and serving wine with meals in restaurants is unduly restrictive; that it is unfair and discriminatory to deny persons in smaller cities and other areas an opportunity to have wine service with their meals in restaurants; that this act is designed to alleviate this situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 545, § 3: Feb. 16, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relating to selling and serving wine with meals in restaurants is unduly restrictive in that it permits the same only in restaurants located in cities having a population of 15,000 or more; that it is unfair and discriminatory to deny persons in smaller cities located in said counties an opportunity to have wine service with their meals in restaurants while permitting the same in larger cities; that this act is designed to alleviate this situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that numerous persons who are resident aliens of the United States desire to operate establishments that dispense alcoholic beverages in the State of Arkansas and that the same are presently prohibited from obtaining a license in their name. It is further found and determined that the requirement of United States citizenship in order to maintain these establishments poses a burden upon commerce and restricts the number of persons who are able to contribute to the overall economy of the State of Arkansas. It is further found and determined that numerous national corporations are hindered in their operations in that they cannot have newly transferred managers or other key employees assume positions of responsibility within their local outlets since those persons do not meet the two (2) year residency requirement and that such requirement poses an unreasonable burden on the conduct of business in this state as it relates to alcohol beverage outlets. It is further found that the present process of applying for or renewing ABC licenses by requiring proof of payment of personal property taxes is cumbersome, unnecessary, and has no direct relationship to the operation of the ABC permitted outlet. It is further found and determined that there are presently numerous conflicting requirements which are applied to applicants for various retail licenses issued by the state ABC Division and that it is necessary and proper that such permit requirements be made uniform. That all of the aforementioned encumbrances are a burden on the transaction of commerce in the state and upon the efficient administration of government in the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1100, § 5: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the law regarding the definition of “restaurant” is necessary to avoid ambiguity in state law and the Arkansas Beverage Control Division's rules. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

3-9-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Director” means the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(2)

“Guest” means a person who orders and is served a meal inside a restaurant during regular hours;

(3)(A)

“License” means a license to sell wine in a restaurant or cafe.

(B)

An annual fee of three hundred dollars ($300) shall be paid for each license or renewal of a license.

(C)

All moneys derived from the annual fees shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund, to be allocated and transferred to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by law, and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.;

(4)

“Meal” means food commonly ordered at various hours of the day;

(5)

“Person” means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation;

(6)(A)

“Restaurant” or “cafe” means a place of business that is regularly used to serve a meal to a guest for compensation and has a suitable kitchen facility to serve an entire menu approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(B)

The menu shall contain a selection of food and shall not be limited to sandwiches or salads.

(C)

The kitchen shall:

(i)

Have adequate refrigeration to preserve the food on the menu;

(ii)

Be kept in a sanitary condition; and

(iii)

Comply with the rules of the Department of Health.

(D)(i)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is authorized and directed to establish appropriate rules defining “established eating places” to the extent that licenses granted under the provisions of this subchapter shall be issued only to those business establishments whose principal business is serving food for consumption on the premises.

(ii)

However, a drive-in shall not be classified as an established eating place; and

(7)

“Wine” or “wines” means any port wine, sherry wine, vermouth wine, or other wines, the alcoholic content of which does not exceed twenty-one percent (21%), regardless of whether the wines are manufactured within or without the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 120, § 1; 1971, No. 441, § 2; 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-626; Acts 2005, No. 1247, § 1; 2009, No. 294, § 24; 2013, No. 1100, §§ 3, 4; 2019, No. 315, §§ 105, 106.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “twenty-one percent (21%)” for “fourteen percent (14%)” in (2).

The 2009 amendment redesignated (3), deleted “as defined herein” following “cafe” in (3)(A), substituted “three hundred dollars ($300)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” in (3)(B), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (4)(A) as (6)(A) and rewrote it; inserted present (2), (4), (6)(B), and (6)(C) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” for “board” in (6)(D)(i).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (6)(C)(iii); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (6)(D)(i).

3-9-302. Penalties.

If any cafe or restaurant licensed to sell wine as authorized in this subchapter shall violate any of the provisions of this subchapter or any of the provisions of other laws of this state regarding the sale of wine at retail, the owner or operator of the cafe or restaurant shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 120, § 6; 1971, No. 441, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-631; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 376.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “Class B” and deleted the former second sentence, which stated: “Upon conviction, the owner or operator shall be fined in the sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned in the county jail not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days, or be both so fined and imprisoned.”

3-9-303. Sale by licensed cafe or restaurant authorized — Restrictions.

(a)

It shall be lawful for a cafe or restaurant, as defined in §3-9-301, in this state to sell wines, as defined in §3-9-301, or hard cider, for consumption with food served in the cafe or restaurant upon obtaining a license, and paying the fee therefor, from the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

However, it shall be unlawful for the director to issue a license to a cafe or restaurant for sales of wine or hard cider served with food in a city, county, township, or other area in this state wherein the sale and possession of wines or hard cider is unlawful.

(c)

All licenses shall be renewed annually in the manner provided by law.

(d)

The holder of a license to sell wine or hard cider in a restaurant or cafe, as defined in §3-9-301, which is located in any city having a population of less than six hundred (600) persons and in a county having a population of less than seventeen thousand five hundred (17,500) persons according to the 1990 Federal Decennial Census and within three (3) miles of a river which serves as a common boundary between that county and another state shall be entitled, in addition to other privileges inherent under the permit, to sell wine or hard cider in unopened containers from such restaurant for off-premises consumption.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 120, § 2; 1971, No. 441, § 3; 1979, No. 141, § 1; 1979, No. 545, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-627; Acts 1989, No. 299, § 1; 1999, No. 1064, § 1; 2019, No. 691, § 22.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” in (a), twice in (b), and twice in (d); and made stylistic changes.

3-9-304. Sale by restaurant located near certain cities.

A restaurant, as defined in §3-9-301, that is located within two (2) miles of a city having a population of at least fifty-five thousand (55,000) but not more than sixty thousand (60,000) persons according to the 1970 Federal Decennial Census, and in an area in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, shall be entitled to make application for and obtain a permit to serve wine or hard cider, or both, with food in such restaurants in the manner prescribed in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 687, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-627.1; Acts 2019, No. 691, § 23.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider, or both”; and made stylistic changes.

3-9-305. License applications — Qualifications.

(a)

A license shall not be issued to a person authorizing the sale of wine or hard cider, or both, at retail for consumption on the premises with food served in any cafe or restaurant unless the person files with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division a verified application therefor, accompanied by the fee required by law, and shall state in the application that he or she possesses the following qualifications:

(1)

The applicant is a person of good moral character, a citizen or resident alien of the United States, and a resident of the county in which the permit will be operated, or resides within thirty-five (35) miles of the address of the premises described in the application;

(2)

The applicant has not been convicted of a felony or has not been convicted within five (5) years of the date of his or her application of any violation of the laws of this state or any other state relating to alcoholic beverages;

(3)

The applicant has not had revoked within five (5) years next preceding his or her application any license issued to him or her pursuant to the laws of this state or any other state to sell alcoholic liquor of any kind;

(4)

The applicant shall be the owner of the premises for which the license is sought or the holder of an existing lease, buy-sell agreement, offer and acceptance, or option to lease thereon;

(5)

If the applicant is a copartner, all members of the copartnership must be qualified to obtain a license;

(6)(A)(i)

If the applicant is a corporation, the president and directors thereof, any stockholder owning more than five percent (5%) of the stock of such corporation who is not exempted under subdivision (6)(A)(ii) of this section, and the person or persons who shall conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation shall possess all the qualifications required herein for an individual license.

(ii)

An applicant is not required to state the identity of its shareholders who are not the president or the director when the corporation:

(a)

Is publicly traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange; or

(b)

Holds at least ten (10) permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(B)

The requirement as to residence in the United States or citizenship of the United States shall not apply to officers, directors, and stockholders of the corporation, but the requirement shall apply to any officer, director, or stockholder who is also the manager of the licensed premises in any capacity in the conduct or operation of the licensed premises; and

(7)

The cafe or restaurant making application for the license is primarily engaged in the business of serving foods to the public prepared for consumption on the premises and must be an established eating place within the rules promulgated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board as provided in §3-9-301(6).

(b)

Any misstatement or concealment of fact in the application shall be grounds for the revocation of any license issued pursuant to the application.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 120, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-628; Acts 1989, No. 295, § 2; 1991, No. 606, § 8; 1995, No. 536, § 3; 1999, No. 948, § 2; 2013, No. 325, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 107; 2019, No. 691, § 24.

Publisher's Notes.

Subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be superseded by §17-1-103 which provides for the removal of an automatic disqualification for criminal convictions in obtaining permits and licenses for professions, trades, or occupations.

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 11, provided:

“It is the intent of this law to no longer require citizenship of the United States in order for a person to hold certain ABC licenses and to eliminate the requirement that persons be a resident of the State of Arkansas for two (2) years prior to the time that they make application for an ABC license. It is also the intent of this law that persons no longer be required to be registered voters in the county in which the permit is located and it is further intended that a person must either reside in the county where the premises is located or live within twenty-five (25) miles of the address of the permitted outlet. It is also the intent of this legislation that proof of payment of personal property taxes to the individual counties will no longer be required in order for a person to apply for or renew an ABC license. It is the further intent of this law that various application requirements regarding convicted felon status, status as it relates to violation of liquor laws of this state or any other state and revocation of permits shall be made uniform among various permits issued by the ABC Division. Therefore, any laws that may conflict with this act shall be and the same hereby are repealed.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(6)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(7).

The 2019 amendment by No. 691 inserted “or hard cider, or both” and substituted “files” for “shall file” in the introductory language of (a); and made stylistic changes.

3-9-306. Prohibited acts.

A holder of a license authorizing the sale of wine or hard cider, or both, for consumption with food served on the premises where sold, or a servant, agent, or employee of the licensee, shall not do any of the following upon the licensed premises:

(1)

Knowingly sell wine or hard cider to a minor;

(2)

Knowingly sell wine or hard cider to a person while the person is in an intoxicated condition;

(3)

Sell wine or hard cider upon the licensed premises or permit wine or hard cider to be consumed thereon on any day or at any time when the sale or consumption is prohibited by law; or

(4)

Permit on the licensed premises any disorderly conduct, breach of peace, or any lewd, immoral, or improper entertainment, conduct, or practices.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 120, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-629; Acts 2019, No. 691, § 25.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” throughout the section; inserted “or both” in the introductory language; and made stylistic changes.

Cross References.

Sales on Christmas Day, §3-3-211.

Sale on Sunday, §3-3-210.

3-9-307. Revocation or suspension of license.

Proceedings for the revocation or suspension of any license issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall be in the same manner as provided by law for revocation or suspension of licenses for sale of beer for consumption on the premises.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 120, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-630.

Cross References.

Revocation or suspension of licenses generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

Subchapter 4

— Sunday Sales

A.C.R.C. Notes.

For current laws authorizing on-premises sales of alcoholic beverages on Sundays, see §§3-3-210,3-9-215, and3-9-216.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-9-401 — 3-9-413. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 294, § 25. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

3-9-401. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 1.

3-9-402. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 2; 1989, No. 837, § 2; 1989, No. 868, § 1.

3-9-403. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 11; 2005, No. 1994, § 337.

3-9-404. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 3; 1995, No. 563, § 3; 2007, No. 1017, § 3.

3-9-405. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 4; 1991, No. 606, § 9.

3-9-406. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 5.

3-9-407. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 6; 1995, No. 563, § 4; 1999, No. 319, § 3.

3-9-408. Acts 1987, No. 766, § 7.

3-9-409. Acts 1987, No. 766, §
8.

3-9-410. Acts 1987, No. 766, §
9; 1995, No. 563, §
5.

3-9-411. Acts 1987, No. 766, §
10; 1995, No. 563, §
6.

3-9-412. Acts 1987, No. 766, §
12.

3-9-413. Acts 1989, No. 868, §
3.

Subchapter 5

— Sunday Beer and Wine Permit

A.C.R.C. Notes.

For current laws authorizing on-premises sales of alcoholic beverages on Sundays, see §§3-3-210,3-9-215, and3-9-216.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-9-501 — 3-9-507. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 294, § 26. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

3-9-501. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
1; 2005, No. 1247, §
2.

3-9-502. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
5.

3-9-503. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
2.

3-9-504. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
3.

3-9-505. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
4.

3-9-506. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
6.

3-9-507. Acts 1995, No. 715, §
7.

Subchapter 6

— Wine and Beer On-Premises License

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-9-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Director” means the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(2)(A)

“License” means a license to sell wine for consumption on the premises.

(B)(i)

An annual fee of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be paid for each license or renewal.

(ii)

All moneys derived from such fees shall be deposited in the State Treasury as general revenues to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund;

(3)

“Person” means any person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation; and

(4)

“Wine” or “wines” means any port, sherry, vermouth, or other wine, the alcoholic content of which does not exceed twenty-one percent (21%) by weight, regardless of whether the wines are manufactured within or without the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 856, § 1; 2005, No. 1247, § 3; 2009, No. 294, § 27.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “twenty-one percent (21%)” for “fourteen percent (14%)” in (4).

The 2009 amendment substituted “five hundred dollars ($500)” for “three hundred dollars ($300)” in (2)(B)(i).

3-9-602. Sale by licensed facility authorized — Restrictions.

(a)

It is lawful for a facility in this state to sell wines or hard cider for consumption on the premises upon obtaining a license from the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and paying the fee therefor, as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

However, it shall be unlawful for the director to issue a license to a facility for sales of wine or hard cider, or both, for consumption on the premises in a city, county, township, or other area in this state wherein the sale and possession of wines or hard cider is unlawful.

(c)

All licenses shall be renewed annually in the manner as is provided by law.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 856, § 3; 2019, No. 691, § 26.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” in (a) and twice in (b); inserted “or both” in (b); and made stylistic changes.

3-9-603. License applications — Qualifications.

(a)

A license shall not be issued to a person authorizing the sale of wine or hard cider, or both, at retail for consumption on the premises unless the person files with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division a verified application therefor accompanied by the fee required by law and states in the application that he or she possesses the following qualifications:

(1)

The applicant is a person of good moral character, a citizen or resident alien of the United States, and a resident of the county in which the permit will be operated or resides within thirty-five (35) miles of the address of the premises described in the application;

(2)

The applicant must be a resident of the State of Arkansas on the date of the application and maintain such residency within the state as a continuing qualification to hold the permit issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(3)

The applicant has never been convicted of a felony or has not been convicted within five (5) years of the date of his or her application of any violation of the laws of this state or any other state relating to alcoholic beverages;

(4)

The applicant has not had revoked within five (5) years immediately preceding his or her application any license issued to him or her pursuant to the laws of this state or any other state to sell alcoholic liquor of any kind;

(5)

The applicant must be the owner of the premises for which the license is sought or the holder of an existing lease, buy-sell agreement, offer and acceptance, or option to lease thereon;

(6)

If the applicant is a copartner, all members of the copartnership must be qualified to obtain a license; and

(7)(A)(i)

If the applicant is a corporation, the president and directors thereof, any stockholder owning more than five percent (5%) of the stock of such corporation who is not exempted under subdivision (a)(7)(A)(ii) of this section, and the person or persons who shall conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation shall possess all the qualifications required herein for an individual license.

(ii)

An applicant is not required to state the identity of its shareholders who are not the president or the director when a corporation:

(a)

Is publicly traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange; or

(b)

Holds at least ten (10) permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(B)

The requirement as to residence shall not apply to officers, directors, and stockholders of the corporation, but the requirement shall apply to any officer, director, or stockholder who is also the manager of the licensed premises in any capacity in the conduct or operation of the licensed premises.

(b)

Any misstatement or concealment of fact in the application shall be grounds for the revocation of any license issued pursuant to the application.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 856, § 4; 2013, No. 325, § 5; 2019, No. 691, § 27.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(7)(A).

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider, or both” in the introductory language of (a); and made stylistic changes.

3-9-604. Prohibited acts.

A holder of a license authorizing the sale of wine or hard cider, or both, for consumption on the premises where sold or a servant, agent, or employee of the licensee shall not do any of the following upon the licensed premises:

(1)

Knowingly sell wine or hard cider to a minor;

(2)

Knowingly sell wine or hard cider to a person while the person is in an intoxicated condition;

(3)

Sell wine or hard cider upon the licensed premises or permit wine or hard cider to be consumed thereon on any day or at any time when the sale or consumption is prohibited by law; or

(4)

Permit on the licensed premises any disorderly conduct, breach of the peace, or any lewd, immoral, or improper entertainment, conduct, or practices.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 856, § 5; 2019, No. 691, § 28.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” throughout the section; inserted “or both” in the introductory language; and made stylistic changes.

3-9-605. Penalties.

If a facility licensed under this subchapter to sell wine or hard cider, or both, for consumption on the premises violates this subchapter or the other laws of this state regarding the sale of wine or hard cider at retail, the owner or operator of the facility is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 856, § 2; 2005, No. 1994, § 377; 2019, No. 691, § 29.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “Class B”; and deleted former (b) and made related changes.

The 2019 amendment inserted “or hard cider” twice; inserted “or both”; and made stylistic changes.

3-9-606. Revocation or suspension of license.

Proceedings for the revocation or suspension of any license issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall be in the same manner as is provided by law for revocation or suspension of licenses for the sale of beer for consumption on the premises.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 856, § 6.

3-9-221. Private clubs — Exception from alcoholic beverage laws.

3-9-232. Inspection of premises and records of licensed premises and private clubs.